Utah statutes.
63B-13-301.   Lease-purchase authorizations.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Mountainland Applied Technology Campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology may use existing funds to enter into a lease-purchase agreement with Alpine School District for the acquisition of the Pacific Avenue Applied Technology Facility costing up to $2,900,000.

(2)  It is further the intent of the Legislature that a lease may not be executed until the State Building Board has determined that the lease-purchase option is less costly to the state than the current lease.



Enacted by Chapter 364, 2004 General Session

